apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="ভন__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="বাটা__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="লা__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="হিউ__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="আফরিন__np_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="অরবিন্দ__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="এনডিএ__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="জয়া__np_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="চীন__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="বড়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="বিরল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তম</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="পৈতৃক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="মহিলা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ঘন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তর</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তম</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Determiners -->

    <pardef n="আমার__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Conjunctions -->
 
    <pardef n="এবং__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Adverbs -->
 
    <pardef n="ও__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Postpositions -->
 
    <pardef n="এর__post">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="post"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


        

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="এবং"><i>এবং</i><par n="এবং__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="আর"><i>আর</i><par n="এবং__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="আমার"><i>আমার</i><par n="আমার__det"/></e>
    <e lm="আমাদের"><i>আমাদের</i><par n="আমার__det"/></e>
    <e lm="তাদের"><i>তাদের</i><par n="আমার__det"/></e>
    <e lm="কোনো"><i>কোনো</i><par n="এর__post"/></e>
    <e lm="কিন্তু"><i>কিন্তু</i><par n="এর__post"/></e>
    <e lm="পাশে"><i>পাশে</i><par n="এর__post"/></e>
    <e lm="এর"><i>এর</i><par n="এর__post"/></e>
    <e lm="অতঃপর"><i>অতঃপর</i><par n="এর__post"/></e>
    <e lm="দিকে"><i>দিকে</i><par n="এর__post"/></e>
    <e lm="মধ্যে"><i>মধ্যে</i><par n="এর__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ছাড়াও"><i>ছাড়াও</i><par n="এর__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউসুফ"><i>ইউসুফ</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="আলি"><i>আলি</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="হিউ"><i>হিউ</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="মধ্যপ্রাচ্য"><i>মধ্যপ্রাচ্য</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মালয়েশিয়া"><i>মালয়েশিয়া</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এলিজাবেথ"><i>এলিজাবেথ</i><par n="আফরিন__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="গুপ্ত"><i>গুপ্ত</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="বেইজিং"><i>বেইজিং</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বার্মিংহাম"><i>বার্মিংহাম</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সান"><i>সান</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সানা"><i>সানা</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="অরবিন্দ"><i>অরবিন্দ</i><par n="অরবিন্দ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="মিনা"><i>মিনা</i><par n="জয়া__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="মিউনিখ"><i>মিউনিখ</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউরিয়া"><i>ইউরিয়া</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডেথ"><i>ডেথ</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="কোরিয়া"><i>কোরিয়া</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ফিলিপাইন"><i>ফিলিপাইন</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হিমালয় পর্বতমালা"><i>হিমালয় পর্বতমালা</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এনডিএ"><i>এনডিএ</i><par n="এনডিএ__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হ্যারি"><i>হ্যারি</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সাংহাই"><i>সাংহাই</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="খালেদা"><i>খালেদা</i><par n="জয়া__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="কালা"><i>কালা</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="রোম"><i>রোম</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অদিতি"><i>অদিতি</i><par n="জয়া__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="পার্থ"><i>পার্থ</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ম্যাথিউ"><i>ম্যাথিউ</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="জাভেদ"><i>জাভেদ</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="রুবি"><i>রুবি</i><par n="জয়া__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বালি"><i>বালি</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সিঙ্গাপুর"><i>সিঙ্গাপুর</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ববি"><i>ববি</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="জ্যাক"><i>জ্যাক</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="রূপা"><i>রূপা</i><par n="জয়া__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="মারিয়া"><i>মারিয়া</i><par n="জয়া__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="দত্ত"><i>দত্ত</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="লালু"><i>লালু</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="মেঘনা"><i>মেঘনা</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আফরিন"><i>আফরিন</i><par n="আফরিন__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="জিয়া"><i>জিয়া</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="হেমা"><i>হেমা</i><par n="জয়া__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="জ্যাকসন"><i>জ্যাকসন</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="বঙ্গোপসাগর"><i>বঙ্গোপসাগর</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জয়া"><i>জয়া</i><par n="জয়া__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="পদ্মা"><i>পদ্মা</i><par n="বাটা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নোবেল"><i>নোবেল</i><par n="ভন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সিলেট"><i>সিলেট</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পিছনে"><i>পিছনে</i><par n="ও__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="গভীরভাবে"><i>গভীরভাবে</i><par n="ও__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="চটজলদি"><i>চটজলদি</i><par n="ও__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="গুরুত্বপূর্ণভাবে"><i>গুরুত্বপূর্ণভাবে</i><par n="ও__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="পরবর্তী"><i>পরবর্তী</i><par n="ও__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="মসৃণভাবে"><i>মসৃণভাবে</i><par n="ও__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="পর্যন্ত"><i>পর্যন্ত</i><par n="ও__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="তাও"><i>তাও</i><par n="ও__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="বন্য"><i>বন্য</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সফল"><i>সফল</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বঞ্চিত"><i>বঞ্চিত</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চলমান"><i>চলমান</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কুমারী"><i>কুমারী</i><par n="মহিলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশেষ"><i>বিশেষ</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তীব্র"><i>তীব্র</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আত্মঘাতী"><i>আত্মঘাতী</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কঠিন"><i>কঠিন</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মহিলা"><i>মহিলা</i><par n="মহিলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গর্ভবতী"><i>গর্ভবতী</i><par n="মহিলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চিহ্নিত"><i>চিহ্নিত</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সঠিক"><i>সঠিক</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আধুনিক"><i>আধুনিক</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্ভাব্য"><i>সম্ভাব্য</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পৃথক"><i>পৃথক</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পৈতৃক"><i>পৈতৃক</i><par n="পৈতৃক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাম্প্রতিক"><i>সাম্প্রতিক</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রধান"><i>প্রধান</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="১৫তম"><i>১৫তম</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পবিত্র"><i>পবিত্র</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরল"><i>বিরল</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্রিটিশ"><i>ব্রিটিশ</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পুরুষ"><i>পুরুষ</i><par n="পৈতৃক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিভাবান"><i>প্রতিভাবান</i><par n="পৈতৃক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সচ্ছল"><i>সচ্ছল</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিশ্চিত"><i>নিশ্চিত</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অন্ধকার"><i>অন্ধকার</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উদ্ভট"><i>উদ্ভট</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘৃণ্য"><i>ঘৃণ্য</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
